District of Columbia statutes.
44-2003

Repealed

Health Advisory Committee; establishment and responsibilities.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1993, D.C. Law 9-197, § 4, 39 DCR 9195
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 808, 42 DCR 3684
1981 Ed., § 32-323.
See notes following § 44-2001.